Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, HB725.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Section 1383 of the act of March 10, 1949 (P.L.30, No.14), known as the Public School Code of 1949, is amended by adding a subsection to read:Section 1383. Extended Special Education Enrollment Due to COVID-19.--* * *(c.2) (1) Through the 2035-2036 school year, the Secretary of Education may permit a student who meets all of the following conditions to attend a school entity through the school year in which the student reaches twenty-two (22) years of age:(i) The student has not graduated from high school.(ii) The student has an active IEP at any point during the 1234567891011121314151617181920 school year in which the student turned twenty-one (21) years of age.(iii) The student has been continuously enrolled in a school entity since the 2020-2021 school year.(2) A school entity shall enroll a student if the Secretary of Education provides permission in accordance with paragraph (1). The Department of Education shall develop a standard election form for a parent or guardian to elect to enroll the student. The following apply:(i) The election form shall be made available on the publicly accessible Internet website of the Department of Education.(ii) The parent or guardian must submit the election form to the Department of Education no later than April 1 of the school year in which the student turns twenty-one (21) years of age.(iii) Within thirty (30) days of receipt of a completed election form, the Secretary of Education shall approve or deny the application and provide notification to the parent or guardian and the school entity.(3) The following shall apply to a student enrolled in a public school entity under this subsection:(i) The student's attendance shall be included in the public school entity's average daily membership.(ii) The public school entity shall take all steps necessary to comply with 20 U.S.C. Ch. 33 (relating to education of individuals with disabilities) and 22 Pa. Code Ch. 14 (relating to special education services and programs).(iii) A student who is twenty-one (21) years of age or older, has an active IEP and is enrolled in a public school entity shall count toward the caseload limitations specified in 20250HB0725PN0746 - 2 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 22 Pa. Code § 14.105 (relating to personnel).* * *Section 2. This act shall take effect immediately.20250HB0725PN0746 - 3 - 123